District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.23

Repealed

Limitation of shareholders’ rights to acquire additional shares.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 190, ch. 269, § 23
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-908j.
1981 Ed., § 29-323.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.23.